Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Nurse Licensure Compact
A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of the withdrawal or termination.

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact.

This compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states.

Article XI Construction and Severability

This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability of the compact to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and its applicability to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 10 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.